Louisiana, session 2026, SB122.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:21(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 48:1(25) and
23.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1. Terms defined
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them by this Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(25) "Bridges" means bridges, overpasses, culverts, and related
structures, together with their structural, load-bearing, safety, and operational
components, that are located on or carry roadways designated as part of the
state highway system and for which the department has responsibility pursuant
to federal and state law.
* * *
§21. Functions
A.(1) The functions of the department shall be to study, administer, construct,
improve, maintain, repair, and regulate the use of public transportation systems and
to perform such other functions with regard to public highways, roads, and other
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 122 ENROLLED
transportation related facilities as may be conferred on the department by applicable
law.
(2) The Department of Transportation and Development shall be
responsible for the following:
(a) The inspection of all bridges that are part of the state highway system
or as applicable pursuant to the terms as defined in R.S. 48:1(10) and (11).
(b) The operation, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation, preservation, and
replacement of all bridges owned by the department.
(c) Oversight of maintenance projects aimed at restoring structural
integrity, improving safety, and extending the lifespan of bridges, including
addressing deterioration, implementing rehabilitation strategies, and managing
emergency repairs to ensure bridges remain safe and operational for the public.
(d) The responsibility of the department under this Subsection shall not
apply to bridges owned or operated by another state agency, a political
subdivision, special district, toll authority, or the federal government, unless
otherwise expressly provided by law.
* * *
§23.1. Bridge review and report to the legislature
A.(1) The department shall prepare and furnish a report detailing the
condition of all bridges maintained, operated or replaced by the department to
the Senate Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works and the
House Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works in a joint
public meeting of the two committees on or before October 1, 2026.
(2) The report shall include at minimum the following:
(a) The number of bridges within the department's responsibility as
defined in R.S. 48:1.
(b) The status of the condition of the bridge.
(c) The type of bridge and the parish where it is located.
(d) The source of funds to maintain the bridge.
(e) The Specifications for the National Bridge Inventory condition rating.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 122 ENROLLED
B. Beginning January 1, 2027, the department shall present a biannual
proposed maintenance plan for the preservation of all bridges maintained by
the department to the Senate Committee on Transportation, Highways and
Public Works and the House Committee on Transportation, Highways and
Public Works in a joint meeting of the two committees.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber the definitions provided in R.S. 48:1.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.